Tennessee, session 114S1, HB6005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated $225,800,000 (recurring) and $198,400,000 (nonrecurring) for the sole
purpose of implementing Senate Bill ___ / House Bill ___, relative to Education Freedom
Scholarships, if such bill becomes a law. Of the $225,800,000 recurring appropriation,
$148,600,000 shall be from the general fund, and $77,200,000 shall be from the privilege tax
collected under Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-49-104(e)(1). The Commissioner of
Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust federal aid and other departmental revenue
accordingly.
SECTION 2. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated $210,000,000 (nonrecurring) for the sole purpose of implementing Senate
Bill ___ / House Bill ___, relative to the Hurricane Helene Interest Payment Fund and the
HB6005
001507
- 1 -

Governor's Response and Recovery Fund, if such bill becomes a law. Of the $210,000,000
nonrecurring appropriation, $110,000,000 shall be deposited to the Hurricane Helene Interest
Payment Fund, and $100,000,000 shall be deposited to the Governor's Response and
Recovery Fund. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is authorized to adjust
federal aid and other departmental revenue accordingly.
SECTION 3. The Commissioner of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to
transfer any interest revenue accrued by the Governor's Response and Recovery Fund to the
Hurricane Helene Interest Payment Fund at June 30 of each fiscal year.
The provisions of this section are subject to Senate Bill ___ / House Bill ___ becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it.
SECTION 4. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $240,000,000 (nonrecurring) to the Department of Military,
TEMA Disaster Relief Grants, to address cost share obligations for the non-federal share of
disaster recovery costs.
SECTION 5. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $20,000,000 (nonrecurring) to the Department of Finance and
Administration to make a grant to the county government of Carter County for the reconstruction
and relocation of Hampton High School. Any unexpended funds shall not revert to the general
fund balance at June 30 and are hereby reappropriated in the subsequent fiscal year.
SECTION 6. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $6,200,000 (recurring) to the Department of Education for the
purpose of making distributions to local education agencies as identified pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 49-3-108(d)(1)(A)(ii), related to active tourism development zones.
SECTION 7. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated the sum of $17,000,000 (recurring) to the Department of Education to
- 2 - 001507

provide direct payments as financial incentives for high-performing LEAs, where more than fifty
percent (50%) of schools in the LEA received an "A" letter grade, pursuant to Tennessee Code
Annotated, Section 49-1-228, for the 2023-2024 school year and future school years.
SECTION 8. In addition to any other funds appropriated by the provisions of this act,
there is appropriated a sum sufficient to the general assembly for the sole purpose of payment
of any lawful expenses, including, but not limited to, staffing, per diem, travel, and other
expenses, of the First Extraordinary Session of the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly.
All expenses for the general assembly, upon the approval of the speaker of the senate, the
speaker of the house of representatives, or both when required, shall be paid through the office
of legislative administration.
SECTION 9. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 10. Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring
it. All other sections of this act take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 001507